District of Columbia statutes.
47-340.16

Conflict of laws.

The procedures set forth in this subchapter shall prevail over any other subchapter of the Council or provision of District law that might be deemed to be inconsistent with this subchapter.

Sept. 20, 1995, D.C. Law 11-46, § 17, 42 DCR 3603
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
1981 Ed., § 47-340.16.